Massachusetts, session 194th, H783.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  The executive office of elder affairs, under authority granted in section 4 of 
chapter 19A of Massachusetts general laws, shall amend the Massachusetts home care 
regulations (651 CMR 3.00).  Such amendment shall require home care program services be 
made available to persons diagnosed with HIV or AIDS regardless of their age, if they are 
otherwise eligible for such services.  The secretary for health and human services shall ensure 
that the relevant agencies under her purview promulgate regulations as necessary to implement 
this act.